Wisconsin, session 2025, SB647.
do enact as follows:SB647,11Section 1. 177.1104 of the statutes is amended to read:SB647,2,32177.1104 Penalties. The provisions of s. ss. 177.1204 and 177.12045 (1) shall 3apply to an amount due as determined and assessed under this chapter.SB647,24Section 2. 177.1201 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB647,2,75177.1201 (4) The attorney general is authorized, upon request from the 6administrator, to represent the state or to assist the district attorney in the 7prosecution of any case arising under s. 177.12045.SB647,38Section 3. 177.1204 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB647,2,99177.1204 (title) Penalties Holder penalties.SB647,410Section 4. 177.12045 of the statutes is created to read:SB647,2,1411177.12045 Fraudulent claim penalties. (1) Civil penalties. (a) Any 12person who files a claim with the administrator for the property of another without 13the other’s consent and with the intent to deprive the owner of such property shall 14pay a penalty equal to the total value of the property.SB647,3,415(b) If a person files a claim described under s. 177.0903 (3), and the copy of the 1agreement under subch. XIII filed with the claim does not comply with the 2requirements under s. 177.1301 (2), the person shall pay a penalty equal to the total 3value of the property plus $1,000 for property valued at no more than $15,000 or 4plus $2,500 for property valued at more than $15,000.SB647,3,85(2) Criminal penalties. Any person who files a claim with the administrator 6for the property of another without the other’s consent and with the intent to 7deprive the owner of such property is guilty of a Class I felony and may be assessed 8the cost of prosecution.SB647,3,159(3) Reporting. The administrator shall post on the website maintained by 10the administrator the name and address of each person who has been assessed a 11penalty under sub. (1) (b), along with the amount of the penalty and the date on 12which the administrator posted the information, no later than 90 days after the 13person’s right to appeal the assessment has expired. The information provided 14under this subsection shall remain on the website maintained by the administrator 15for at least 12 months following the date of the initial posting.SB647,516Section 5. 177.1205 of the statutes is amended to read:SB647,3,1817177.1205 Waiver of penalties. The administrator may waive, in whole or in 18part, the penalties imposed under s. ss. 177.1204 and 177.12045 (1).SB647,3,1919